ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동: 아메리칸 풋볼; 오스트레일리아식 풋볼; 야구/소프트볼; 농구; 비치 테니스; 권투/무술; 브룸볼 장비; 치어리딩; 코치/심판 용품; 크리켓; 컬링; 무용; 펜싱; 필드하키/라크로스; 피겨 스케이팅/하키; 게일릭 게임(GAA); 다용도 운동 장비; 체조; 넷볼; 라켓볼/스쿼시; 라운더스; 럭비; 축구; 팀 핸드볼; 테니스; 육상 경기; 트라이애슬론; 얼티밋 프리스비; 배구; 월리볼 장비; 수구; 레슬링
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo: Fútbol americano; Fútbol australiano; Béisbol y sóftbol; Baloncesto; Tenis de playa; Boxeo y artes marciales; Equipamiento para Broomball; Animadoras; Accesorios para árbitros; Cricket; Rizado; Baile; Esgrima; Hockey sobre hierba y lacrosse; Patinaje artístico y hockey; Juegos Gaélicos (GAA); Equipamiento para atletismo de uso general; Gimnasia; Netball; Ráquetbol y squash; Rounders; Rugby; Fútbol; Balonmano; Tenis; Atletismo; Triatlón; Ultimate frisbee; Vóleibol; Equipamiento para wallyball; Waterpolo; Lucha libre
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径: 美式橄榄球; 澳式橄榄球; 棒球/垒球用品; 篮球用品; 沙滩网球; 拳击/武术; 扫帚球装备; 啦啦队用品; 教练与裁判用品; 板球用品; 冰壶; 舞蹈; 击剑; 陆上曲棍球/长曲棍球; 花样滑冰与冰球; 盖尔运动 (GAA); 通用体育用品; 体操; 无板篮球; 短网拍墙球/壁球; 圆场球用具; 英式橄榄球用品; 足球用品; 手球; 网球用品; 田径用品; 铁人三项; 极限飞盘; 排球用品; 壁排球设备; 水球运动; 摔跤用品
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika: Američki nogomet; Australski nogomet; Bejzbol i softbol; Košarka; Tenis na pijesku; Boks i borilačke vještine; Oprema za metlomet; Navijanje; Treniranje i suđenje; Kriket; Curling; Ples; Mačevanje; Hokej na travi i lacrosse; Umjetničko klizanje i hokej; Galske igre (GAA); Sportska oprema opće namjene; Gimnastika; Netball; Reketbol i skvoš; Rounders; Ragbi; Nogomet; Rukomet; Tenis; Atletske discipline; Triatlon; Ultimate frizbi; Odbojka; Oprema za wallyball; Vaterpolo; Hrvanje
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育: 美式足球; 澳式足球; 棒球和壘球; 籃球; 沙灘網球; 拳擊與武術; 掃帚球裝備; 啦啦隊; 教練和裁判用具; 板球; 冰壺; 舞蹈; 擊劍; 草地曲棍球/袋棍球; 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球; 蓋爾運動（GAA）; 一般體育配備; 體操; 無板籃球; 短柄牆球/壁球; 繞圈球; 橄欖球; 足球; 手球; 網球; 田徑; 鐵人三項; 終極飛盤; 排球; 壁排球用品; 水球; 摔角
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes: Futebol americano; Futebol australiano; Beisebol e softbol; Basquete; Beach tennis; Boxe e artes marciais; Equipamento de broomball; Líder de torcida; Treinamento e arbitragem; Críquete; Curling; Dança; Esgrima; Hóquei de campo e lacrosse; Patinação artística e hóquei; Jogos Gaélicos (GAA); Equipamento para esportes em geral; Ginástica; Netball; Raquetebol e squash; Rounders; Rúgbi; Futebol; Handebol; Tênis; Atletismo; Triatlo; Ultimate frisbee; Voleibol; Equipamento de wallyball; Polo aquático; Luta grego-romana
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu: Amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Australialainen jalkapallo; Baseball ja softball; Koripallo; Rantatennis; Nyrkkeily ja vapaaottelu; Luutapallovälineet; Cheerleading; Valmennus ja tuomarointi; Kriketti; Curling; Tanssi; Miekkailu; Maahockey ja lacrosse; Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko; Gaelilaiset lajit (GAA); Yleistarvikkeet urheiluun; Voimistelu; Verkkopallo; Racquetball ja squash; Rounders; Rugby; Jalkapallo; Käsipallo; Tennis; Yleisurheilu; Triathlon; Ultimate; Lentopallo; Wallyball-varusteet; Vesipallo; Paini
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技: アメリカンフットボール; オーストラリアンフットボール; 野球・ソフトボール用品; バスケットボール; ビーチテニス; ボクシング・格闘技; ブルームボール用品; チアリーディング; 指導者・審判向け用品; クリケット; カーリング; ダンス; フェンシング用品; フィールドホッケー・ラクロス用品; フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品; ゲーリックゲームズ (GAA); スポーツ競技用多目的器材; 体操; ネットボール; スカッシュ・ラケットボール; ラウンダーズ; ラグビー; サッカー; ハンドボール用品; テニス; 陸上; トライアスロン; アルティメットフリスビー; バレーボール; ウォーリーボール用品; 水球用品; レスリング
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva: Futebol Americano; Futebol australiano; Basebol e softbol; Basquetebol; Ténis de praia; Boxe e artes marciais; Equipamento para broomball; Claques; Itens para treinadores e árbitros; Críquete; Curling; Dança; Esgrima; Lacrosse e hóquei em campo; Hóquei e patinagem artística; Jogos Gaélicos (GAA); Equipamento desportivo geral; Ginástica; Netball; Squash e raquetebol; Rounders; Râguebi; Futebol; Andebol; Ténis; Atletismo; Triatlo; Ultimate frisbee; Voleibol; Equipamento de wallyball; Polo-aquático; Luta livre
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett: Amerikansk fotball; Australsk fotball; Baseball og softball; Basketball; Beachtennis; Boksing og kampsport; Broomballutstyr; Cheerleading; Dømming; Cricket; Curling; Dansing; Fekting; Landhockey og Lacrosse; Kunstløp og hockey; Gæliske leker (GAA); Treningsutstyr for generelle formål; Gymnastikk; Netball; Racquetball og squash; Slåball; Rugby; Fotball; Håndball; Tennis; Track & Field; Triatlon; Ultimate frisbee; Volleyball; Wallyball-utstyr; Vannpolo; Bryting
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika: Amerikietiškasis futbolas; Australijos taisyklių futbolas; Beisbolas ir softbolas; Krepšinis; Paplūdimio tenisas; Boksas ir kovos menai; Šluotbolo įranga; Komandų palaikymo šokiai; Treniravimas ir sporto administravimas; Kriketas; Kerlingas; Šokiai; Fechtavimas; Žolės riedulys ir lakrosas; Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys; Gėlų žaidynės (GAA); Bendrosios paskirties sportinė įranga; Gimnastika; Netbolas; Raketbolas ir skvošas; Rounders; Regbis; Futbolas; Komandinis rankinis; Tenisas; Lengvoji atletika; Triatlonas; „Ultimate“ lėkščiasvydžis; Tinklinis; Volibolo įranga; Vandensvydis; Imtynės
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport: Football americano; Football australiano; Baseball e softball; Basket; Beach tennis; Boxe e arti marziali; Attrezzature da broomball; Cheerleading; Arbitraggio e allenamento; Cricket; Curling; Danza; Scherma; Hockey su prato e lacrosse; Pattinaggio di figura e hockey; Giochi gaelici (GAA); Attrezzature sportive generiche; Ginnastica; Netball; Racquetball e squash; Rounder; Rugby; Calcio; Pallamano in squadra; Tennis; Tracciato e campo atletica; Triathlon; Ultimate frisbee; Volleyball; Attrezzature da wallyball; Pallanuoto; Wrestling
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports: Football américain; Football australien; Base-ball et softball; Basket-ball; Beach tennis; Boxe et arts martiaux; Équipement de ballon-balai; Cheerleading; Accessoires d'entraînement et d'arbitrage; Criquet; Curling; Danse; Escrime; Hockey sur gazon et lacrosse; Patinage artistique et hockey; Jeux gaéliques (GAA); Matériel de sport; Gymnastique; Netball; Racquetball et squash; Rounders; Rugby; Football; Handball; Tennis; Athlétisme; Triathlon; Ultimate Frisbee; Volleyball; Équipement de wallyball; Water polo; Lutte
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism: Fotbal american; Fotbal australian; Baseball și softball; Mingi de baschet; Tenis de plajă; Box și arte marțiale; Echipament pentru broomball; Majorete; Antrenamente și prezentare; Crichet; Ondulare; Dans; Scrimă; Hochei pe iarbă și lacrosse; Patinaj artistic și hochei; Jocuri gaelice (GAA); Echipament sportiv de uz general; Gimnastică; Netball; Racquetball și squash; Rounders; Rugby; Fotbal; Handbal în echipă; Tenis; Atletism; Triatlon; Ultimate frisbee; Volei; Echipament pentru wallyball; Polo pe apă; Lupte
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания: Американски футбол; Австралийски футбол; Бейзбол и софтбол; Баскетбол; Плажен тенис; Бокс и бойни изкуства; Екипировка за брумбол; Мажоретки; Треньорство и съдийство; Крикет; Кърлинг; Танци; Фехтовка; Хокей на трева и лакрос; Фигурно пързаляне и хокей; Галски спортове (GAA); Спортно оборудване с общо предназначение; Гимнастика; Нетбол; Ракетбол и скуош; Раундърс; Ръгби; Футбол; Хандбал; Тенис; Лека атлетика; Триатлон; Фризби за ултимейт; Волейбол; Екипировка за уолибол; Водна топка; Борба
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh: Bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Bóng đá luật Úc; Bóng chày & Bóng mềm; Bóng rổ; Quần vợt bãi biển; Đấm bốc & Võ thuật; Dụng cụ chơi bóng vợt; Thể dục cổ vũ; Huấn luyện thể dục thể thao; Bóng gậy; Bi đá trên băng; Khiêu vũ; Đấu kiếm hiện đại; Khúc côn cầu trên cỏ và bóng vợt; Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu; Các môn thể thao Gaelic (GAA); Thiết bị thể thao thông dụng; Thể dục dụng cụ; Bóng lưới; Bóng quần; Cờ bạc; Bóng bầu dục; Bóng đá; Bóng ném; Quần vợt; Các môn điền kinh; Ba môn phối hợp; Ném đĩa Ultimate Frisbee; Bóng chuyền; Thiết bị bóng tường; Bóng nước; Đấu vật
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten: American Football; Australian rules football; Honkbal en softbal; Basketbal; Beachtennis; Boksen en vechtsporten; Broomballbenodigdheden; Cheerleaden; Coachen en scheidsrechteren; Cricket; Curling; Dansen; Schermen; Hockey en lacrosse; Kunstrijden en ijshockey; Gaelic Games (GAA); Algemene atletiekbenodigdheden; Gymnastiek; Netbal; Racquetball en squash; Rounders; Rugby; Voetbal; Teamhandbal; Tennis; Atletiek; Triatlon; Ultimate frisbee; Volleybal; Benodigdheden voor wallybal; Waterpolo; Worstelen
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา: อเมริกันฟุตบอล; ออสเตรเลียนรูลส์ฟุตบอล; เบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; บาสเก็ตบอล; เทนนิสชายหาด; มวยและศิลปะการต่อสู้; อุปกรณ์บรูมบอล; เชียร์ลีดดิ้ง; การโค้ชและการกำกับ; คริกเก็ต; เคอร์ลิง; เต้น; การฟันดาบ; ฮอกกี้บนพื้นหญ้าและลาครอส; สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้; กีฬาเกลิก (GAA); อุปกรณ์กีฬาสำหรับวัตถุประสงค์ทั่วไป; ยิมนาสติก; เนตบอล; แร็กเกตบอลและสควอช; ราวน์เดอร์; รักบี้; ฟุตบอล; แฮนด์บอลทีม; เทนนิส; กรีฑา; ไตรกีฬา; อัลติเมทฟริสบี; วอลเลย์บอล; อุปกรณ์วอลลี่บอล; โปโลน้ำ; มวยปล้ำ
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport: Futbol amerykański; Futbol australijski; Baseball i softball; Koszykówka; Tenis plażowy; Boks i sztuki walki; Sprzęt do gry w broomball; Cheerleading; Akcesoria sędziowskie; Krykiet; Curling; Taniec; Szermierka; Hokej na trawie i lacrosse; Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej; Gry gaelickie (GAA); Sprzęt ogólnosportowy; Gimnastyka; Netball; Racquetball i squash; Palant; Rugby; Piłka nożna; Piłka ręczna; Tenis; Lekkoatletyka; Triathlon; Ultimate Frisbee; Siatkówka; Sprzęt do gry w wallyball; Piłka wodna; Zapasy
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika: Amerikai futball; Ausztrál futball; Baseball és softball; Kosárlabda; Strandtenisz; Boksz és harcművészetek; Broomball-felszerelés; Szurkolás; Edzés és játékvezetés; Krikett; Curling; Tánc; Vívás; Gyeplabda és lacrosse; Műkorcsolya és jégkorong; Gael játékok (GAA); Általános célú atlétikai felszerelések; Gimnasztika; Netball; Raketball és squash; Rounders; Rögbi; Futball; Csapatkézilabda; Tenisz; Atlétika; Triatlon; Ultimate frizbi; Röplabda; Wallyball-felszerelés; Vízilabda; Birkózás
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics: American Football; Australian Rules Football; Baseball & Softball; Basketball; Beach Tennis; Boxing & Martial Arts; Broomball Equipment; Cheerleading; Coaching & Officiating; Cricket; Curling; Dancing; Fencing; Field Hockey & Lacrosse; Figure Skating & Hockey; Gaelic Games (GAA); General Purpose Athletic Equipment; Gymnastics; Netball; Racquetball & Squash; Rounders; Rugby; Soccer; Team Handball; Tennis; Track & Field; Triathlon; Ultimate Frisbee; Volleyball; Wallyball Equipment; Water Polo; Wrestling
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport: Ameriški nogomet; Avstralski nogomet; Baseball in softball; Košarka; Tenis na mivki; Boks in borilne veščine; Oprema za metlomet; Navijaško plesanje; Trenerstvo in sodništvo; Kriket; Vihanje; Ples; Sabljanje; Hokej na travi in lacrosse; Umetnostno drsanje in hokej; Gelske igre (GAA); Splošna športna oprema; Gimnastika; Netball; Racquetball in skvoš; Rounders; Ragbi; Nogomet; Ekipni rokomet; Tenis; Atletika; Triatlon; Ultimate frizbi; Odbojka; Oprema za wallyball; Vaterpolo; Rokoborba
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika: Americký futbal; Austrálsky futbal; Bejzbal a softbal; Basketbal; Plážový tenis; Box a bojové umenia; Vybavenie pre metlobal; Roztlieskavanie; Koučovanie a organizácia športového podujatia; Kriket; Curling; Tanec; Šerm; Pozemný hokej a lakros; Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej; Írske hry (GAA); Športové vybavenie na všeobecné použitie; Gymnastika; Netball; Raketbal a squash; Rounders; Ragby; Futbal; Tímová hádzaná; Tenis; Atletická dráha; Triatlon; Ultimate frisbee; Volejbal; Wallyballové vybavenie; Vodné pólo; Zápasenie
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik: Amerikansk fodbold – bold; Australsk fodbold; Baseball og softball; Basketball; Strandtennis; Boksning og kampsport; Broomballudstyr; Cheerleading; Dommerudstyr; Cricket; Styrkeløft; Dans; Fægtning; Lacrosse og udendørs hockey; Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey; Gæliske Lege (GAA); Træningsudstyr; Gymnastik; Netball; Racquetball og squash; Rundbold; Rugby; Fodbold; Håndbold; Tennis; Baneatletik; Triatlon; Ultimate frisbee; Volleyball; Udstyr til wallyball; Vandpolo; Brydning
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός: Αμερικανικό ποδόσφαιρο; Αυστραλιανό ποδόσφαιρο; Mπέιζμπολ/σόφτμπολ; Μπάσκετ; Τένις παραλίας; Πυγμαχία & πολεμικές τέχνες; Εξοπλισμός μπρουμπόλ; Μαζορέτες; Προπονητική & διαιτησία; Κρίκετ; Κέρλινγκ; Χορός; Ξιφασκία; Χόκεϊ επί χόρτου & λακρός; Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ; Γαελικά παιχνίδια (GAA); Αθλητικός εξοπλισμός γενικής χρήσης; Ενόργανη γυμναστική; Νέτμπολ; Ρακέτα και σκουός; Ράουντερς (Rounders); Ράγκμπι; Ποδόσφαιρο; Χάντμπολ; Τένις; Στίβος; Τρίαθλο; Ultimate φρίσμπι; Βόλεϊ; Εξοπλισμός wallyball; Πόλο (υδατοσφαίριση); Πάλη
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт: Американский футбол; Австралийский футбол; Бейсбол и софтбол; Баскетбол; Пляжный теннис; Бокс и единоборства; Инвентарь для брумбола; Чирлидинг; Товары для тренеров и судей; Крикет; Керлинг; Танцы; Фехтование; Хоккей на траве и лакросс; Хоккей и фигурное катание; Гэльские игры (GAA); Спортивное оборудование общего назначения; Гимнастика; Нетбол; Ракетбол и сквош; Английская лапта; Регби; Футбол; Гандбол; Теннис; Легкая атлетика; Триатлон; Алтимат-фрисби; Волейбол; Инвентарь для воллибола; Водное поло; Спортивная борьба
de: Sportartikel > Athletik: American Football; Australian Football; Baseball & Softball; Basketball; Beach-Tennis; Boxen & Kampfsport; Broomball-Ausrüstung; Cheerleading; Trainer- & Schiedsrichterausrüstung; Kricket; Curling; Tanzen; Fechten; Feldhockey & Lacrosse; Eiskunstlauf & Hockey; Gälische Spiele (GAA); Allgemeine Sportartikel; Gymnastik; Netball; Racquetball & Squash; Rounders; Rugby; Fußball; Handball; Tennis; Leichtathletik; Triathlon; Ultimate Frisbee; Volleyball; Wallyball-Ausrüstung; Wasserball; Ringen
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty: Americký fotbal; Australský fotbal; Baseball a softball; Basketbal; Plážový tenis; Box a bojové sporty; Vybavení na broomball; Roztleskávání; Potřeby pro trenéry a rozhodčí; Kriket; Curling; Tanec; Šerm; Pozemní hokej a lakros; Krasobruslení a hokej; Gaelské hry (GAA); Víceúčelové atletické vybavení; Gymnastika; Netball; Raketbal a squash; Pálkovaná; Ragby; Kopaná; Týmová házená; Tenis; Atletika; Triatlon; Ultimate frisbee; Volejbal; Vybavení na wallyball; Vodní pólo; Zápas
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport: Amerikansk fotboll; Australisk fotboll; Baseball och softball; Basketboll; Beachtennis; Boxning och kampsporter; Broomball; Cheerleading; Domarutrustning; Cricket; Curling; Dans; Fäktning; Landhockey och lacrosse; Konståkning och hockey; Gaelic Games (GAA); Idrottsutrustning för allmänt bruk; Gymnastik; Netball; Racketboll och squash; Rounders; Rugby; Fotboll; Handboll; Tennis; Friidrott; Triathlon; Ultimate frisbee; Volleyboll; Wallyball-utrustning; Vattenpolo; Brottning
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları: Amerikan Futbolu; Avustralya futbolu; Beyzbol ve Softbol; Basketbol; Plaj tenisi; Boks ve Dövüş Sporları; Broomball Malzemeleri; Amigoluk; Koçluk ve Hakemlik; Kriket; Curling; Dans; Eskrim; Çim Hokeyi ve Lakros; Artistik Paten ve Hokey; Gal Oyunları (GAA); Genel Amaçlı Spor Malzemeleri; Jimnastik; Netbol; Racquetball ve Squash; Rounders; Ragbi; Futbol; Takım Hentbolu; Tenis; Atletizm; Triatlon; Ultimate frizbi; Voleybol; Wallyball Malzemeleri; Su Polosu; Güreş